Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.140

Board of trustees—Organization—Officers—Compensation—Expenses.

The members of the first district board shall meet on the first Monday subsequent to thirty days after the filing with the secretary of state of the certificate of incorporation of the district. They shall organize by the election of one of their members as president and one as secretary.

The members of the district board shall serve without compensation; but the necessary expenses of each member for actual traveling in connection with meetings or business of the board may be allowed and paid.

The secretary shall receive such compensation as shall be fixed by the district board.

[ 1957 c 153 s 14.]